Washington statutes.
RCW 11.24.050

Costs.

If the probate be revoked or the will annulled, assessment of costs shall be in the discretion of the court. If the will be sustained, the court may assess the costs against the contestant, including, unless it appears that the contestant acted with probable cause and in good faith, such reasonable attorney's fees as the court may deem proper.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.24.050. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 19; RRS s 1389; prior: Code 1881 s 1366; 1860 p 177 s 69.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SPR 98.12W.

Personal representative

allowance of necessary expenses: RCW 11.48.050.

compensation—Attorney's fee: RCW 11.48.210.